District of Columbia statutes.
1-1021.01

Timeliness of action.

For purposes of this or any other act administered by the Board of Elections and Ethics, if the final date for any action falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, such action shall be considered timely if taken on the next regular business day immediately thereafter; provided, that if the action is required for compliance with the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voter Act, approved August 28, 1986 (100 Stat. 924; 42 U.S.C. § 1973ff et seq.), and the final date for completing the action falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, it shall be considered timely if taken on the immediately preceding regular business day.

History

June 7, 1979, D.C. Law 3-1, § 6, 25 DCR 9454
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-273, § 3, 62 DCR 1938

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1322.
1973 Ed., § 1-1118.

Effect of Amendments

The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-273 added “provided, that if the action is required for compliance with the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voter Act, approved August 28, 1986 (100 Stat. 924; 42 U.S.C. § 1973ff et seq.), and the final date for completing the action falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, it shall be considered timely if taken on the immediately preceding regular business day.”

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-273, § 5, see § 21 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Clarification Temporary Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Law 21-76, Feb. 27, 2016, 63 DCR 264).

References in Text

“This ____ act,” referenced in this section is the Initiative, Referendum and Recall Procedures Act of 1979, effective June 7, 1979, D.C. Law 3-1.

Editor's Notes

Acts administered by Board: Chapter 13 (except §§ 1-207.52 and 1-1011.01) and Chapter 11 of Title 1 are administered by the Board of Elections and Ethics.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-273: Section 5 of D.C. Law 20-273 provided (a) that the act shall apply upon the date of inclusions of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan; (b) that the Chief Financial Officer shall certify the date of the inclusion of the fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, and provide notice to the Budget Director of the Council of the certification; and (c) that the Budget Director shall cause the notice of the certification to be published in the District of Columbia Register and that the date of publication of the notice of the certification shall not affect the applicability of the act.

The Budget Director of the Council of the District of Columbia has determined that the fiscal effect of D.C. Law 20-273 has been included in an approved budget and financial plan.